Utah statutes.
46-1-14.   Entries in journal.
(1)  For every notarial act, the notary may record the following information
in the journal at the time of notarization:
(a)  the date and time of day of the notarial act;
(b)  the type of notarial act;
(c)  a description of the document or proceeding;
(d)  the signature and printed name and address of each person for whom a
notarial act is performed;
(e)  the evidence of identity of each person for whom a notarial act is
performed, in the form of:
(i)  a statement that the person is "personally known" to the notary;
(ii)  a description of the identification document, its issuing agency, its
serial or identification number, and its date of issuance or expiration; or
(iii)  the signature and printed name and address of a credible witness
swearing or affirming to the person's identity; and
(f)  the fee, if any, charged for the notarial act.
(2)  A notary may record in the journal the circumstances in refusing to
perform or complete a notarial act.
